Indiana, session 2026, SB52.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 31-17-5-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A child's
grandparent may seek visitation rights if:
(1) the child's parent is deceased;
(2) the marriage of the child's parents has been dissolved in
Indiana; or
(3) subject to subsection (b), the child was born out of wedlock;
or
(4) the grandparent has had a demonstrable history of
meaningful contact with the child.
(b) A court may not grant visitation rights to a paternal grandparent
of a child who is born out of wedlock under subsection (a)(3) if the
child's father has not established paternity in relation to the child.
SECTION 2. IC 31-17-5-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) A child's:
(1) parent;
2026 IN 52—LS 6190/DI 148


(2) guardian; or
(3) custodian;
may submit a confidential statement to the court outlining
concerns regarding a grandparent's petition, including any history
of abuse, neglect, or any other factor relevant to the child's
well-being.
(b) If a statement is submitted under subsection (a), the court
shall:
(1) review a statement submitted under subsection (a) in
camera; and
(2) seal the record to protect the parties' privacy.
SECTION 3. IC 31-17-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.16-2017,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A proceeding for grandparent's visitation
must be commenced by the filing of a petition entitled, "In Re the
visitation of _________". The petition must:
(1) be filed by a grandparent entitled to receive visitation rights
under this chapter;
(2) be verified; and
(3) set forth the following:
(A) The names and relationship of:
(i) the petitioning grandparent or grandparents;
(ii) each child with whom visitation is sought; and
(iii) the custodial parent or guardian of each child.
(B) The present address of each person named in clause (A).
(C) The date of birth of each child with whom visitation is
sought.
(D) The status under section 1 of this chapter upon which the
grandparent seeks visitation.
(E) The history of meaningful contact with the child if the
petitioning grandparent is seeking visitation under section
1(a)(4) of this chapter.
(E) (F) The relief sought.
(b) A petition described in subsection (a) must be filed prior to the
date a decree of adoption is entered.
SECTION 4. IC 31-17-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.50-2006,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. A grandparent seeking visitation rights shall
file a petition requesting reasonable visitation rights:
(1) in a circuit, superior, or probate court of the county in which
the child resides in a case described in section 1(a)(1), 1(a)(3),
1(a)(4), or 10 of this chapter; or
2026 IN 52—LS 6190/DI 148


(2) in the court having jurisdiction over the dissolution of the
parents' marriage in a case described in section 1(a)(2) of this
chapter.
2026 IN 52—LS 6190/DI 148